Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.2. Virginia Housing Development Authority Act.
§ 36-55.44.
Deposit and investment of moneys of HDA.

All moneys of HDA except as otherwise authorized or provided in this chapter shall be deposited as soon as practicable in a separate account or accounts in banks or trust companies organized under the laws of the Commonwealth, in national banking associations, in federal home loan banks, or to the extent then permitted by law, in savings institutions organized under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia or the United States. The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on checks, drafts payable on demand, electronic wire transfers, or other means authorized by HDA. Each payment shall be approved by the executive director or such other officers or employees of HDA as HDA shall authorize. Deposits of such moneys shall, if required by HDA, be secured as it shall prescribe, and all banks and trust companies are authorized to give such security for such deposits.

Unless otherwise limited by contract with the holders of any of its notes or bonds or with any other parties making loans to HDA, any moneys of HDA and any moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of such notes, bonds or loans may be invested in (i) obligations or securities which are considered lawful investments for fiduciaries, both individual and corporation, as set forth in §

2.2-4519

, (ii) any investments and deposits authorized by Chapter 45 (§

2.2-4500

et seq.) of Title 2.2, and (iii) any other investments which are permitted pursuant to subsection C for moneys held under any bond resolution or trust indenture of the Authority and which, when acquired by HDA, have, or are general obligations of issuers who have, long-term ratings of at least AA or Aa or the highest short-term ratings, as applicable, by two rating agencies, one of which shall be Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or Standard & Poor’s Ratings Group or any successor thereto.

In addition to the authorization in subsection B and regardless of any other provisions of law which would otherwise have the effect of limiting the powers set forth in this subsection, HDA shall have power to contract with the holders of any of its notes or bonds and with any other parties making loans to HDA as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any moneys of HDA and of any moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of such notes, bonds or loans, and to carry out such contracts. Unless otherwise specified in such contracts, moneys held in trust or otherwise for the payment of notes, bonds or loans or in any way to secure notes, bonds or loans and deposits of such moneys may be secured in the same manner as set forth in subsection A.

Whenever investments are made in accordance with this section, no commissioner or employee of HDA shall be liable for any loss therefrom in the absence of negligence, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on his part.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536; 1982, cc. 231, 235; 1993, c. 224; 1996, c. 77; 1998, c. 442.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “26-40” was changed to “2.2-4519” to conform to Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 1996 amendment

substituted “savings institutions” for “savings and loan associations” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (1).

The 1998 amendment

redesignated former subsections (1), (3) and (4) as present subsections A, C and D; in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “in national banking associations” for “or national banking associations,” and inserted “in federal home loan banks” following “in national banking associations”; deleted former subdivision (2) which read: “Subject to the provisions of subsection (3), funds of HDA not needed for immediate use or disbursement, including any funds held in reserve, may be invested in (i) obligations or securities which are considered lawful investments for fiduciaries, both individual and corporation, as set forth in § 26-40 of Chapter 3 of Title 26 and amendments thereto and (ii) bankers’ acceptances”; and added present subsection B; in present subsection C, in the first sentence, substituted “In addition to the authorization in subsection B and regardless of” for “Notwithstanding,” inserted “which would otherwise have the effect of limiting the powers set forth in this subsection,” inserted “and with any other parties making loans to HDA,” and substituted “such notes, bonds or loans” for “notes or bonds,” in the second sentence, substituted “notes, bonds or loans” for “notes or bonds” following “payment of notes,” substituted “secure notes bonds or loans” for “secure notes or bonds” and substituted “subsection A” for “subsection (1) of this section.”

§ 36-55.44:1.
Swap agreements by HDA authorized.

In connection with, or incidental to, the issuance or carrying of notes or bonds or the acquisition or carrying of any investments, HDA may enter into swap agreements or other contracts or arrangements which HDA determines to be necessary or appropriate to place obligations or investments of HDA, as represented by notes, bonds or investments of HDA, in whole or in part, on the interest rate, currency, cash flow or other basis desired by HDA or to hedge payment, currency, rate, spread, or other exposure. Such contracts or arrangements may be entered into by HDA in connection with, or incidental to, entering into or maintaining (i) any agreement which secures notes or bonds of HDA and is authorized or permitted by law or (ii) any investment, or contract providing for any investment, otherwise authorized or permitted by law.

Such contracts and arrangements may contain such payment, security, default, remedy, and other terms and conditions as determined by HDA, after giving due consideration to the creditworthiness of the counterparty or other obligated party, including any rating by any nationally recognized rating agency, and any other criteria as may be appropriate.

In connection with, or incidental to, any of these contracts or arrangements, HDA may enter into credit enhancement or liquidity agreements with such terms and conditions as HDA shall determine.

History.

1994, c. 84.

§ 36-55.45.
Agreement with Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth does hereby pledge to and agree with the holders of any notes or bonds issued under this chapter that the Commonwealth will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in HDA to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the said holders thereof or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until such notes and bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of such holders, are fully met and discharged. HDA is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the Commonwealth in any agreement with the holders of such notes or bonds.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.46.
Commonwealth not liable on notes and bonds.

The notes, bonds or other obligations of HDA shall not be a debt or grant or loan of credit of the Commonwealth of Virginia, and the Commonwealth shall not be liable thereon, nor shall they be payable out of any funds other than those of HDA; and such notes and bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to such effect.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.47.
Remedies of noteholders and bondholders.

In the event that HDA shall default in the payment of principal of or interest on any issue of notes and bonds after the same shall become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and such default shall continue for a period of thirty days, or in the event that HDA shall fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of this chapter, or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of any issue of notes or bonds, the holders of twenty-five per centum in aggregate principal amount of the notes or bonds of such issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the clerk of the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, Commonwealth of Virginia, and proved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of such notes or bonds for the purposes herein provided.

Such trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five per centum in principal amount of such notes or bonds then outstanding shall, in his or its own name:

By suit, action or proceeding in accordance with the provisions of Title 8.01, enforce all rights of the noteholders or bondholders, including the right to require HDA to carry out any agreements with such holders and to perform its duties under this chapter;

Bring suit upon such notes or bonds;

By action or suit, require HDA to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of such notes or bonds;

By action or suit, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of such notes or bonds;

Declare all such notes or bonds due and payable, and if all defaults shall be made good, then, with the consent of the holders of twenty-five per centum of the principal amount of such notes or bonds then outstanding, annul such declaration and its consequences.

The Circuit Court of the City of Richmond shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action or proceeding by the trustee on behalf of such noteholders or bondholders. The venue of any suit, action or proceeding shall be laid in the City of Richmond, Commonwealth of Virginia.

Before declaring the principal of notes or bonds due and payable, the trustee shall first give thirty days’ notice in writing to HDA.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.48.
Grants from Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth may make grants of money or property to HDA for the purpose of enabling it to carry out its corporate purposes and for the exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, deposits to the reserve funds. This section shall not be construed to limit any other power the Commonwealth may have to make such grants to HDA.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.49.
Notes and bonds as legal investments.

The notes and bonds of HDA shall be legal investments in which all public officers and public bodies of this Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, all banks, bankers, banking associations, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or in other obligations of the Commonwealth, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. The notes and bonds are also hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of the Commonwealth or any agency or political subdivisions of the Commonwealth and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law including but not limited to security for deposits pursuant to Chapter 44 (§

2.2-4400

et seq.) of Title 2.2 and amendments thereto.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1975, c. 536.

§ 36-55.50.
Liberal construction.

Neither this chapter nor anything herein contained is or shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which HDA might otherwise have under any laws of this Commonwealth, and this chapter is cumulative to any such powers. This chapter does and shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. However, the issuance of bonds, notes and other obligations and refunding bonds under the provisions of this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other state law applicable to the issuance of bonds, notes and other obligations, and contracts for the construction and acquisition of any housing developments undertaken pursuant to this chapter need not comply with the provisions of any other state law applicable to contracts for the construction and acquisition of state-owned property. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds, notes and other obligations or any instrument as security therefor, except as is provided in this chapter.

History.

1972, c. 830.

§ 36-55.51.
Reports.

HDA shall submit to the Governor within ninety days after the end of its fiscal year a complete and detailed report setting forth:

In order to maintain liaison in development of housing policy, the HDA shall also have the duty of providing reports to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development on its policies, objectives, priorities, operations and programs, both present and projected, so as to assist the Director in the formulation of his reports to the Governor and General Assembly regarding housing and community development policies, goals, plans and programs.

Its operations and accomplishments;

Its receipts and expenditures during such fiscal year in accordance with the categories or classifications established by HDA for its operating and capital outlay purposes;

Its assets and liabilities at the end of its fiscal year, including a schedule of its mortgage loans and commitments and the status of reserve, special or other funds; and

A schedule of its notes and bonds outstanding at the end of its fiscal year, together with a statement of the amounts redeemed and incurred during such fiscal year.

History.

1972, c. 830; 1977, c. 613.

§ 36-55.51:1.
Annual audit.

An annual audit shall be conducted on the accounts of HDA by an independent certified public accountant, and such audit shall be reviewed by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The cost of such audit and review shall be borne by HDA.

History.

1987, c. 451.

§ 36-55.52.
Inconsistent provisions in other laws superseded.

Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, general, special or local, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

History.

1972, c. 830.